Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 MINNESOTA HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.051, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Application. This section applies to all forms of financial assistance provided by the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, as well as the allocation and award of federal low-income housing creditsnew text begin by all allocating agencies as defined under section 462A.221new text end , for the development, construction, rehabilitation, renovation, or retrofitting of deleted text begin multiunit residentialdeleted text end new text begin multifamilynew text end housing, including loans, grants, tax credits, loan guarantees, loan insurance, and other financial assistance. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Promotion of materials on rights and obligations of landlords and residential tenants. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall publish information on the rights and obligations of landlords and residential tenants, including promotion of the statement required under section 504B.275. The commissioner must prominently display this information on the agency website. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.2095, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Grants to program administrators. (a) The agency may make grants to program administrators to provide rental assistance for eligible households. new text begin Notwithstanding section 16C.06, the commissioner may use a formula to determine award amounts to program administrators. new text end For both tenant-based and project-based assistance, program administrators shall pay assistance directly to housing providers. Rental assistance may be provided in the form of tenant-based assistance or project-based assistance. Notwithstanding the amounts awarded under subdivision 1, paragraph (b), and to the extent practicable, the agency must make grants statewide in proportion to the number of households eligible for assistance in each county according to the most recent American Community Survey of the United States Census Bureau.new text begin The agency may, at its discretion, redistribute unused or underutilized funds among eligible program administrators to increase program efficiency and effectiveness.new text end (b) The program administrator may use its existing procedures to administer the rent assistance program or may develop alternative procedures with the goals of reaching households most in need and incentivizing landlord participation. The agency must approve a program administrator's alternative procedures. Priority for rental assistance shall be given to households with children 18 years of age and under, and annual incomes of up to 30 percent of the area median income. Program administrators may establish additional priority populations based on local need. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.33, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Grant funding to schools. A school district; a cooperative unit, as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or a charter school may receive funding under this section in the form of a grant less than $100,000. A school district, intermediate district, or charter school that uses a grant under this section to construct a home for owner occupancy must require the future occupant to participate in the homeownership education counseling and training program under section 462A.209.new text begin A nonprofit organization contracted by a school district; a cooperative unit, as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2; or a charter school may receive funding under the requirements of this subdivision.new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.37, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Authorization. (a) The agency may issue up to $30,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of housing infrastructure bonds in one or more series to which the payment made under this section may be pledged. The housing infrastructure bonds authorized in this subdivision may be issued to fund loans, or grants for the purposes of clauses (4) and (7), on terms and conditions the agency deems appropriate, made for one or more of the following purposes: (1) to finance the costs of the construction, acquisition,new text begin adaptive reuse,new text end and rehabilitation of supportive housing where at least 50 percent of units are set aside for individuals and families who are without a permanent residence; (2) to finance the costs of the acquisition and rehabilitation of foreclosed or abandoned housing to be used for affordable rental housing or for affordable home ownership and the costs of new construction of rental housing on abandoned or foreclosed property where the existing structures will be demolished or removed; (3) to finance that portion of the costs of acquisition of property that is attributable to the land to be leased by community land trusts to low- and moderate-income home buyers; (4) to finance the acquisition, improvement, and infrastructure of manufactured home parks under section 462A.2035, subdivision 1b; (5) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of senior housing; (6) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, and replacement of federally assisted rental housing and for the refinancing of costs of the construction, acquisition, and rehabilitation of federally assisted rental housing, including providing funds to refund, in whole or in part, outstanding bonds previously issued by the agency or another government unit to finance or refinance such costs; (7) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of single-family housing; (8) to finance the costs of construction, acquisition,new text begin adaptive reuse,new text end and rehabilitation of permanent housing that is affordable to households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income for the applicable county or metropolitan area as published by the Department of Housing and Urban Development, as adjusted for household size; and (9) to finance the costs of construction, acquisition, rehabilitation, conversion, and development of cooperatively owned housing created under chapter 308A, 308B, or 308C that is affordable to low- and moderate-income households. (b) Among comparable proposals for permanent supportive housing, preference shall be given to permanent supportive housing for veterans and other individuals or families who: (1) either have been without a permanent residence for at least 12 months or at least four times in the last three years; or (2) are at significant risk of lacking a permanent residence for 12 months or at least four times in the last three years. (c) Among comparable proposals for senior housing, the agency must give priority to requests for projects that: (1) demonstrate a commitment to maintaining the housing financed as affordable to senior households; (2) leverage other sources of funding to finance the project, including the use of low-income housing tax credits; (3) provide access to services to residents and demonstrate the ability to increase physical supports and support services as residents age and experience increasing levels of disability; and (4) include households with incomes that do not exceed 30 percent of the median household income for the metropolitan area. (d) To the extent practicable, the agency shall balance the loans made between projects in the metropolitan area and projects outside the metropolitan area. Of the loans made to projects outside the metropolitan area, the agency shall, to the extent practicable, balance the loans made between projects in counties or cities with a population of 20,000 or less, as established by the most recent decennial census, and projects in counties or cities with populations in excess of 20,000. (e) Among comparable proposals for permanent housing, the agency must give preference to projects that will provide housing that is affordable to households at or below 30 percent of the area median income. (f) If a loan recipient uses the loan for new construction as defined by the agency on a building containing more than four units, the loan recipient must construct, convert, or otherwise adapt the building to include: (1) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are accessible units, and each accessible unit includes at least one roll-in shower, water closet, and kitchen work surface meeting the requirements of section 1002 of the current State Building Code Accessibility Provisions for Dwelling Units in Minnesota; and (2) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are sensory-accessible units that include: (A) soundproofing between shared walls for first and second floor units; (B) no florescent lighting in units and common areas; (C) low-fume paint; (D) low-chemical carpet; and (E) low-chemical carpet glue in units and common areas. Nothing in this paragraph relieves a project funded by the agency from meeting other applicable accessibility requirements. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.39, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Allocation. The amount of a grant or deferred loans may not exceed 50 percent of the rental housing development project cost. The commissioner shall not award a grant or deferred loans to an eligible project area without certification by the eligible project area that the amount of the grant or deferred loans shall be matched by a local unit of government, business, nonprofit organization, or federally recognized Tribe, with $1 for every $2 provided in grant or deferred loans funds.new text begin If an eligible project area is selected for an award of a grant or loan under section 462A.40 and the award is funded by contributions to the Minnesota housing tax credit account that are intended for a specific project in the eligible project area, the amount of the award may count toward the matching requirement of this subdivision.new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.40, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Use of funds; grant and loan program. (a) The agency may award grants and loans to be used new text begin for workforce housing and new text end for multifamily and single family developments for persons and families of low and moderate income. Allowable use of the funds include: gap financing, as defined in section 462A.33, subdivision 1; new construction; acquisition; rehabilitation; demolition or removal of existing structures; construction financing; permanent financing; interest rate reduction; and refinancing. (b) The agency may give preference for grants and loans to comparable proposals that include regulatory changes or waivers that result in identifiable cost avoidance or cost reductions, including but not limited to increased density, flexibility in site development standards, or zoning code requirements. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.40, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligible recipients; definitions; restrictions; use of funds. (a) The agency may award a grant or a loan to any recipient that qualifies under subdivision 2. The agency must not award a grant or a loan to a disqualified individual or disqualified business. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision disqualified individual means: (1) an individual who or an individual whose immediate family member made a contribution to the account in the current or prior taxable year and received a credit certificate; (2) an individual who or an individual whose immediate family member owns the housing for which the grant or loan will be used; (3) an individual who meets the following criteria: (i) the individual is an officer or principal of a business entity; and (ii) that business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate; or (4) an individual who meets the following criteria: (i) the individual directly owns, controls, or holds the power to vote 20 percent or more of the outstanding securities of a business entity; and (ii) that business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate. (c) For the purposes of this subdivision disqualified business means a business entity that: (1) made a contribution to the account in the current or prior taxable year and received a credit certificate; (2) has an officer or principal who is an individual who made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate; or (3) meets the following criteria: (i) the business entity is directly owned, controlled, or is subject to the power to vote 20 percent or more of the outstanding securities by an individual or business entity; and (ii) that controlling individual or business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate. (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "immediate family" means the taxpayer's spouse, parent or parent's spouse, sibling or sibling's spouse, or child or child's spouse. For a married couple filing a joint return, the limitations in this subdivision apply collectively to the taxpayer and spouse. new text begin (e) For purposes of this subdivision, "officer or principal" excludes an individual serving as a volunteer board member of a nonprofit organization governed by chapter 317A. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Before applying for a grant or loan, all recipients must sign a disclosure that the disqualifications under this subdivision do not apply. The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must prescribe the form of the disclosure. The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency may rely on the disclosure to determine the eligibility of recipients under paragraph (a). deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end The agency may award grants or loans to a city as defined in section 462A.03, subdivision 21; a federally recognized American Indian tribe or subdivision located in Minnesota; a tribal housing corporation; a private developer; a nonprofit organization; a housing and redevelopment authority under sections 469.001 to 469.047; a public housing authority or agency authorized by law to exercise any of the powers granted by sections 469.001 to 469.047; or the owner of the housing. The provisions of subdivision 2, and paragraphs (a) to deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end and deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end of this subdivision, regarding the use of funds and eligible recipients apply to grants and loans awarded under this paragraph. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h) new text end Eligible recipients must use the funds to serve households that meet the income limits as provided in section 462A.33, subdivision 5. new text begin This requirement does not apply to a project meeting the requirements of section 462A.39, subdivision 4, paragraph (a).new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462C.16, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given to them. (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency. (c) "Fund" means a local housing trust fund or a regional housing trust fund. (d) "Local government" means any statutory or home rule charter citynew text begin , a housing and redevelopment authority,new text end or a county. (e) "Local housing trust fund" means a fund established by a local government with one or more dedicated sources of public revenue for housing. (f) "Regional housing trust fund" means a fund established and administered under a joint powers agreement entered into by two or more local governments with one or more dedicated sources of public revenue for housing. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.35, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of proceeds. (a) Any funds distributed under this section must be spent on a qualifying project. Funds are considered spent on a qualifying project if: (1) a tier I city or county demonstrates to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency that the city or county cannot expend funds on a qualifying project by the deadline imposed by paragraph (b) due to factors outside the control of the city or county; and (2) the funds are transferred to a local housing trust fund. Funds transferred to a local housing trust fund under this paragraph must be spent on a project or household that meets the affordability requirements of subdivision 4, paragraph (a). (b) Funds must be spent by December 31 in the third year following the year after the aid was received. The requirements of this paragraph are satisfied if funds are: (1) committed to a qualifying project by December 31 in the third year following the year after the aid was received; and (2) expended by December 31 in the fourth year following the year after the aid was received. (c) An aid recipient may not use aid money to reimburse itself for prior expenditures. new text begin (d) Any program income generated from funds distributed under this section must be used on a qualifying project. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of proceeds. (a) Any funds distributed under this section must be spent on a qualifying project. If a tier I city or county demonstrates to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency that the tier I city or county cannot expend funds on a qualifying project by the deadline imposed by paragraph (b) due to factors outside the control of the tier I city or county, funds shall be considered spent on a qualifying project if the funds are transferred to a local housing trust fund. Funds transferred to a local housing trust fund must be spent on a project or household that meets the affordability requirements of subdivision 4, paragraph (a). (b) Funds must be spent by December 31 in the third year following the year after the aid was received. The requirements of this paragraph are satisfied if funds are: (1) committed to a qualifying project by December 31 in the third year following the year after the aid was received; and (2) expended by December 31 in the fourth year following the year after the aid was received. (c) An aid recipient may not use aid funds to reimburse itself for prior expenditures. new text begin (d) Any program income generated from funds distributed under this section must be used on a qualifying project. new text end Sec. 12. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 1, section 2, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Local Housing Trust Fund Grants 4,800,000 -0- (a) This appropriation is for deposit in the housing development fund for grants to local housing trust funds established under Minnesota Statutes, section 462C.16, to incentivize local funding. This is a onetime appropriation. (b) A grantee is eligible to receive a grant amount equal to 100 percent of the public revenue committed to the local housing trust fund from any source other than the state or federal government, up to $150,000, and in addition, an amount equal to 50 percent of the public revenue committed to the local housing trust fund from any source other than the state or federal government that is more than $150,000 but not more than $300,000. (c) A grantee must use grant funds within deleted text begin eightdeleted text end new text begin fivenew text end years of receipt for purposes (1) authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 462C.16, subdivision 3, and (2) benefiting households with incomes at or below 115 percent of the state median income. A grantee must return any grant funds not used for these purposes within eight years of receipt to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for deposit into the housing development fund. Sec. 13. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 2, section 10, is amended to read: Sec. 10. HIGH-RISE SPRINKLER SYSTEM GRANT new text begin AND LOAN new text end PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. (b) "Eligible building" means an existing residential building in which: (1) deleted text begin at least one story used for human occupancy isdeleted text end new text begin the building is seven stories or more in height ornew text end 75 feet or more above the lowest level of fire department vehicle access; and (2) at least two-thirds of its units are affordable to households with an annual income at or below deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 60new text end percent of the area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, adjusted for family sizedeleted text begin , that is paying no more than 30 percent of annual income on rentdeleted text end . (c) "Sprinkler system" means the same as the term "fire protection system" as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299M.01. Subd. 2. deleted text begin Grant programdeleted text end new text begin Use of fundsnew text end . The commissioner of the Housing Finance Agency must make grants new text begin or loans new text end to owners of eligible buildings for installation of sprinkler systems and, if necessary, for relocation of residents during the installation of sprinkler systems. Priority shall be given to nonprofit applicants. The maximum grant per eligible building shall be $2,000,000. Each grant to a nonprofit organization shall require a 25 percent match. Each grant to a for-profit organization shall require a 50 percent match. ARTICLE 2 PUBLIC CORPORATION FOR RENTAL PROPERTY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.082, is amended to read: 15.082 OBLIGATIONS OF PUBLIC CORPORATIONS. Notwithstanding any other law, the state is not liable for obligations of a public corporation created by statute. Upon dissolution of the public corporation, its wholly owned assets become state property. Partially owned assets become state property to the extent that state money was used to acquire them. This section does not apply to a public corporation governed by chapter 119new text begin or section 469.0121new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.202, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Permanent rental housing. The agency may make loans, with or without interest, to cities and counties to finance the construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable, permanent, new text begin and new text end publicly owned rental housingnew text begin , including housing owned by a public corporation created pursuant to section 469.0121new text end . Loans made under this subdivision are subject to the restrictions of subdivision 7. In making loans under this subdivision, the agency shall give priority to projects that increase the supply of affordable family housing. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462C.02, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. City. "City" means any statutory or home rule charter city, a county housing and redevelopment authority created by special law or authorized by its county to exercise its powers pursuant to section 469.004, or any public body which (a) is the housing and redevelopment authority in and for a statutory or home rule charter city, the port authority of a statutory or home rule charter city, deleted text begin ordeleted text end an economic development authority of a city established under sections 469.090 to 469.108, new text begin or a public corporation created pursuant to section 469.0121, new text end and (b) is authorized by ordinance to exercise, on behalf of a statutory or home rule charter city, the powers conferred by sections 462C.01 to 462C.10. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.012, subdivision 2j, is amended to read: Subd. 2j. May be in LLP, LLC, or corporation; bound as if HRA. new text begin (a) new text end An authority may become a member or shareholder in and enter into or form limited partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations for the purpose of developing, constructing, rehabilitating, managing, supporting, or preserving housing projects and housing development projects, including low-income housing tax credit projects. These limited partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations are subject to all of the provisions of sections 469.001 to 469.047 and other laws that apply to housing and redevelopment authorities, as if the limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation were a housing and redevelopment authority. new text begin (b) An authority may create a public corporation in accordance with section 469.0121 for the purpose of purchasing, owning, and operating real property converted through the federal Rental Assistance Demonstration program under Public Law 112-55, as amended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [469.0121] PUBLIC CORPORATION; RENTAL ASSISTANCE DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Authority" has the meaning given under section 469.002, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Board" means the board of directors of a corporation created under this section. new text end new text begin (d) "Corporation" means a public corporation created under this section. new text end new text begin (e) "RAD" means the federal Rental Assistance Demonstration program under Public Law 112-55, as amended. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public corporation created. new text end new text begin An authority may create a public corporation to purchase, own, and operate real property that has been converted through RAD to preserve and improve public housing properties. A public corporation created under this section is also a political subdivision of the state and is limited to the powers in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Corporation powers. new text end new text begin (a) The corporation has the following general powers: new text end new text begin (1) to have succession until dissolved by law; new text end new text begin (2) to sue and be sued in its corporate name; new text end new text begin (3) to adopt, alter, and use a corporate seal which shall be judicially noticed; new text end new text begin (4) to accept, hold, and administer gifts and bequests of money, securities, or other personal property of whatsoever character, absolutely or in trust, for the purposes for which the corporation is created. Unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or bequest, the corporation is authorized to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of and to invest or reinvest in such investments as the corporation may determine with the money, securities, or other property given or bequeathed to the corporation. The principal of and income from the corporate funds and all other revenues received by the corporation from any source whatsoever shall be placed in such depositories as the board of directors shall determine and shall be subject to expenditure for corporate purposes; new text end new text begin (5) to enter into contracts generally and to execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out the corporate purposes; new text end new text begin (6) to appoint and prescribe the duties of officers, agents, and employees as may be necessary to carry out the work of the corporation and to compensate officers, agents, and employees; new text end new text begin (7) to purchase all supplies and materials necessary for carrying out the purposes of the corporation; new text end new text begin (8) to accept from the United States, the state of Minnesota, or any of their agencies money or other assistance whether by gift, loan, or otherwise to carry out the purposes of the corporation, and enter into contracts with the United States, the state of Minnesota, any of the agencies of either, or any of the political subdivisions of the state as it may deem proper and consistent with the purposes of this section; new text end new text begin (9) to contract and make cooperative agreements with federal, state, and municipal departments and agencies and private corporations, associations, and individuals for the use of the corporation property, including but not limited to rental agreements; and new text end new text begin (10) to acquire real or personal property or any interest therein in any manner authorized under section 469.012, subdivision 1g, including by the exercise of eminent domain. new text end new text begin (b) A corporation may acquire properties converted under RAD, subject to restrictions and conditions compatible with funding acquisitions of and improvements to real property with state general obligation bond proceeds. The commissioner of management and budget must determine the necessary restrictions and conditions under this paragraph. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Board of directors. new text end new text begin (a) A corporation is governed by a board of directors, with each commissioner of the authority that created the corporation serving as a member. new text end new text begin (b) The term of a director shall coincide with their term as a commissioner of the authority that created the corporation, except that a director's term shall continue after their term as a commissioner is complete until a successor commissioner is duly appointed and qualified. new text end new text begin (c) Board members must not be compensated for their service as board members but may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with their duties as board members. The state auditor must review the reimbursements to board members each year. new text end new text begin (d) The board must annually elect from among its members a chair and other officers necessary for the performance of its duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Bylaws. new text end new text begin The board of directors must adopt bylaws and rules as it deems necessary for the administration of its functions and the accomplishment of its purpose, including among other matters the establishment of a business office and the rules, the use of the project-based rental assistance properties, and the administration of corporation funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Place of business. new text end new text begin The board must locate and maintain the corporation's place of business in the city in which the authority that created the corporation is located. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Open meetings; data practices. new text end new text begin Meetings of the board are subject to chapter 13D and meetings of the board conducted by interactive technology are subject to section 13D.02. The board is subject to chapter 13, the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act, and shall protect data classified as not public from unlawful disclosure. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Compliance. new text end new text begin The corporation must comply with all federal, state, and local laws, rules, ordinances, and other regulations required to own and operate properties as project-based rental assistance properties. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Dissolution. new text end new text begin Upon dissolution of the corporation for any reason, its wholly owned assets become property of the authority that created the corporation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end